Washington statutes.
RCW 41.35.901

Effective date—1998 c 341.

Except for sections 303, 306 through 309, 404, 505, 507, 515, 701, 707, and 710 through 713 of this act, this act takes effect September 1, 2000.

[ 1998 c 341 s 714.]